Maryland, session 2025, HB0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–357.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RECORD THAT:
(1) IS A COURT RECORD; OR
(2) PERTAINS TO LITIGATION THAT HAS BEEN FINALLY ADJUDICATED
OR OTHERWISE SETTLED.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A CUSTODIAN MAY
DENY INSPECTION OF A RECORD PERTAINING TO PENDING OR REASONABLY
ANTICIPATED LITIGATION TO WHICH:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0821*

HOUSE BILL 821
(1) THE STATE, A STATE AGENCY, OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE IS OR MAY BE A PARTY; OR
(2) AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, BECAUSE OF THAT PERSON’S OFFICE OR EMPLOYMENT,
IS OR MAY BE A PARTY.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT ANY RIGHT
OR OPPORTUNITY GRANTED BY STATUTE OR COURT RULE FOR A PARTY TO
LITIGATION TO RECEIVE DISCOVERY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.